Utah statutes.
34A-2-415.   Increase of benefits to a dependent -- Effect of death, marriage, majority, or termination of dependency of children -- Death, divorce, or remarriage of spouse.

If a benefit is made to, or increased because of a dependent spouse or dependent minor child, as provided in this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, the benefit or increase in amount of the benefit shall cease on the day on which:

(1)  a minor child:

(a)  dies;

(b)  marries;

(c)  becomes 18 years of age; or

(d)  is no longer dependent; or

(2) the spouse of the employee:

(a)  dies;

(b)  divorces the employee; or

(c)  subject to Section 34A-2-414 relative to the remarriage of a spouse, remarries.

